Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201845-918.03
Rescission; redemption.

(1) A maker shall have the right to rescind a delayed deposit transaction before 5 p.m. the next business day following the delayed deposit transaction.

(2) Prior to the licensee negotiating or presenting the check, the maker shall have the right to redeem any check held by a licensee as a result of a delayed deposit transaction if the maker pays the full amount to the licensee.

Laws 2018, LB194, § 12.